Georgia, session 2025_26, HB222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 3 of Chapter 6 of Title 17 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
bonds and recognizances in criminal proceedings, is amended by revising Code Section
17-6-73, relating to address of principle and surety on bond or recognizance, as follows:
"17-6-73.
Every bond or recognizance given to secure the appearance of any person in any criminal
proceeding shall have entered thereon the following legible information:
(a) The full name of the principal and each surety;
(b) The mailing address of the principal and each surety;
(c) The email address of the principal and each surety; and
(d) The phone number of the principal and each surety."
H. B. 222
- 1 -

LC 48 1345/AP
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 222
- 2 -